Utah statutes.
26-21-16.   Operating facility in violation of chapter a misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalties in Section 26-23-6, any person owning, establishing, conducting, maintaining, managing, or operating a health care facility in violation of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

